Hawaii statutes.
[§344-3] Environmental policy. It
shall be the policy of the State, through its programs, authorities, and
resources to:

(1) Conserve the natural resources, so that land,
water, mineral, visual, air and other natural resources are protected by
controlling pollution, by preserving or augmenting natural resources, and by
safeguarding the State’s unique natural environmental characteristics in a
manner which will foster and promote the general welfare, create and maintain
conditions under which humanity and nature can exist in productive harmony, and
fulfill the social, economic, and other requirements of the people of Hawaii.

(2) Enhance the quality of life by:

(A) Setting population limits so that the
interaction between the natural and artificial environments and the population
is mutually beneficial;

(B) Creating opportunities for the residents
of Hawaii to improve their quality of life through diverse economic activities
which are stable and in balance with the physical and social environments;

(C) Establishing communities which provide a
sense of identity, wise use of land, efficient transportation, and aesthetic
and social satisfaction in harmony with the natural environment which is
uniquely Hawaiian; and

(D) Establishing a commitment on the part of
each person to protect and enhance Hawaii’s environment and reduce the drain on
nonrenewable resources. [L 1974, c 247, pt of §1; gen ch 1993]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next